Connecticut, session 2026, SB00411.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (e) of section 29-4 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
3 passage):
4 (e) [Salaries] (1) Except as provided in an agreement executed
5 pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section, salaries of the members of the
6 Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency Services
7 and Public Protection shall be fixed by the Commissioner of
8 Administrative Services as provided in section 4-40. State police
9 personnel may be promoted, demoted, suspended or removed by the
10 commissioner, but no final dismissal from the service shall be ordered
11 until a hearing has been had before the Commissioner of Emergency
12 Services and Public Protection on charges preferred against such officer.
13 Each state police officer shall, before entering upon such officer's duties,
14 be sworn to the faithful performance of such duties. The Commissioner
sSB411 / File No. 309 1

sSB411 File No. 309
15 of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall designate an
16 adequate patrol force for motor patrol work exclusively.
17 (2) For any sworn member of the Division of State Police within the
18 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection assigned to a
19 highway construction project administered by the Department of
20 Transportation, such sworn member shall be paid at a rate established
21 pursuant to an agreement executed between the Commissioner of
22 Emergency Services and Public Protection and the Commissioner of
23 Transportation on or after the effective date of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 29-4(e)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (e)(2), "on or after the effective date of this section" was
inserted for clarity.
PS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB411 / File No. 309 2

sSB411 File No. 309
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which has no fiscal impact, requires any sworn member of
the Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency
Services and Public Protection (DESPP) assigned to a Department of
Transportation (DOT) highway construction project to be paid pursuant
to an agreement between DESPP and DOT. This bill conforms to current
agency practices.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sSB411 / File No. 309 3

sSB411 File No. 309
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 411
AN ACT CONCERNING STATE POLICE ASSIGNED TO HIGHWAY
CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS.